vim/spell/el_GR.aff
SFX X Y 5
SFX X ώ   ιόμουν      .               # αγαπώ > αγαπιόμουν
SFX X ός  ή           .               # καλός > καλή
SFX X ος  η           .               # δάσος > δάση
SFX X ής  ή           .               # νικητής > νικητή
SFX X ης  η           .               # ναύτης > ναύτη

SFX Y Y 4
SFX Y ώ       ιόσουν  .               # αγαπώ > αγαπιόσουν
SFX Y όμουν   όσουν   .               # δενόμουν > δενόσουν
SFX Y ω       ουμε    .               # δένω > δένουμε
SFX Y η       εων     .               # σκέψη > σκέψεων


SFX Z Y 3
SFX Z ώ       ιόταν   .               # αγαπώ > αγαπιόταν
SFX Z μουν   ταν      όμουν           # δενόμουν > δενόταν
SFX Z ς      δων      ές              # καφές > καφέδων

SFX a Y 4
SFX a ώ     ιόμαστε      .            # αγαπώ > αγαπιόμαστε
SFX a ός    ό            .            # καλός > καλό
SFX a ω     αμε          .            # δένω > δέναμε
SFX a 0     με           α            # αγαπούσα > αγαπούσαμε


SFX b Y 4
SFX b ώ    ιόσαστε     .               # αγαπώ > αγαπιόσαστε
SFX b ω    ατε         .               # δένω > δένατε
SFX b με   τε          αμε             # αγαπήσαμε > αγαπήσατε
SFX b 0    τε          α               # αγαπούσα > αγαπούσατε

SFX c Y 3
SFX c ώ      ιόνταν    .               # αγαπώ > αγαπιόνταν
SFX c όμουν  όνταν     .               # θυμόμουν > θυμόνταν
SFX c ω      ονταν     .               # δένω > δένονταν

SFX d Y 4
SFX d ώ      ιούνταν     .             # αγαπώ > αγαπιούνταν
SFX d ω      ου          .             # δένω > δένου
SFX d 0      υ           ο             # σίδερο > σίδερου
SFX d ς      υ           ος            # δρόμος > δρόμου

SFX e Y 4
SFX e  ώ    ούνται   .                 # λυπώ > λυπούνται
SFX e  ω    ε        .                 # δένω > δένε
SFX e  ος   ε        .                 # δρόμος > δρόμε
SFX e  α    ε        .                 # αγαπούσα > αγαπούσε

SFX f Y 3
SFX f ώ   άσαι   .                     # λυπώ > λυπάσαι
SFX f ί   ιού    .                     # πουλί > πουλιού
SFX f ς   δες    ης                    # νοικοκύρης > νοικοκύρηδες

SFX g Y 4
SFX g ώ          άται        .         # λυπώ > λυπάται
SFX g ός         ότων        .         # γεγονός γεγονότων
SFX g ης         ηδων        .         # νοικοκύρης > νοικοκύρηδων
SFX g α          αν          .         # αγαπούσα > αγαπούσαν

SFX h Y 4
SFX h ώ          ούμαστε     .         # λυπώ > λυπούμαστε
SFX h ώς         ώτος        .         # καθεστώς > καθεστώτος
SFX h όμουν      όμαστε      .         # δενόμουν > δενόμαστε
SFX h α          ας          .         # ώρα > ώρας

SFX i Y 4
SFX i ώ          ώντας       .         # αγαπώ > αγαπώντας
SFX i ής         ές          .         # νικητής > νικητές
SFX i ά          ές          .         # καρδιά > καρδιές
SFX i ή          ές          .         # ψυχή > ψυχές

SFX j Y 3
SFX j ης         ικο         .         # ζηλιάρης > ζηλιάρικο
SFX j ω          τε          .         # δέσω > δέστε
SFX j ος         ους         .         # δρόμος > δρόμους

SFX k Y 3
SFX k ω          εται        .         # δένω > δένεται
SFX k ος         οι          .         # δρόμος > δρόμοι
SFX k ας         ατος        .         # κρέας > κρέατος

SFX l Y 4
SFX l υ          ια          .         # βράδυ > βράδια
SFX l ι          ια          .         # καλοκαίρι > καλοκαίρια
SFX l ώ          ούμαι       .         # λυπώ > λυπούμαι
SFX l ής         ήδων        .         # μπαλωματής > μπαλωματήδων

SFX m Y 3
SFX m ώ          άει         .         # αγαπώ > αγαπάει
SFX m όμουν      όσαστε      .         # δενόμουν > δενόσαστε
SFX m ω          ει          .         # δένω > δένει

SFX n Y 3
SFX n ύς         ιοί         .        # βαθύς > βαθιοί
SFX n ώ          είτε        .        # αγαπηθώ > αγαπηθείτε
SFX n ος         ο           .        # δρόμος > δρόμο

# sound folding from Aspell
# version 0.0 03/14/2002
# 03/14/2002 Evripidis Papakostas <evris@source.gr>

# all the following double letters are pronounced as one
SAL ΒΒ-                        _
SAL Β                          Β
SAL ΓΓ                         ΓΚ
SAL Γ                          Γ
SAL ΔΔ-                        _
SAL Δ                          Δ
SAL ΖΖ-                        _
SAL Ζ                          Ζ
SAL ΘΘ-                        _
SAL Θ                          Θ
SAL ΚΚ-                        _
SAL ΚΣ                         Ξ
SAL Κ                          Κ
SAL ΛΛ-                        _
SAL Λ                          Λ
SAL ΜΜ-                        _
SAL Μ                          Μ
SAL ΝΝ-                        _
SAL Ν                          Ν
SAL ΠΠ-                        _
SAL ΠΣ                         Ψ
SAL Π                          Π
SAL ΡΡ-                        _
SAL Ρ                          Ρ
SAL ΣΣ-                        _
SAL Σ                          Σ
SAL ΤΤ-                        _
SAL Τ                          Τ
SAL ΦΦ-                        _
SAL Φ                          Φ
SAL ΧΧ-                        _ 
SAL Χ                          Χ

# alpha + (ypsilon or ypsilon tonos) becomes alpha + beta
SAL ΑΎ<                        ΑΥ
SAL ΑΥΝΤ--                     ΑΒ
SAL ΑΥΓΚ--                     ΑΒ
SAL ΑΥΤΖ--                     ΑΒ
SAL ΑΥ(ΓΔΖΛΜΝΡ)-               ΑΒ
SAL ΑΥΒ                        ΑΒ
SAL ΑΥ(ΑΕΗΙΟΩΥΆΈΉΊΌΏΎ)-        ΑΒ

# alpha + (ypsilon or ypsilon tonos) becomes alpha + phi
SAL ΑΥΦ                        ΑΦ
SAL ΑΥΤΣ--                     ΑΦ
SAL ΑΥ(ΘΚΠΣΤΧ)-                ΑΦ
SAL ΑΥΞ-                       ΑΦ
SAL ΑΥΨ-                       ΑΦ

# alpha + (iota or iota tonos) becomes epsilon
SAL Α(ΙΊ)                      Ε

# alpha is alpha
SAL Α                          Α

# epsilon + (ypsilon or ypsilon tonos) becomes epsilon + vita
SAL ΕΎ<                        Υ
SAL ΕΥΝΤ--                     ΕΒ
SAL ΕΥΓΚ--                     ΕΒ
SAL ΕΥΤΖ--                     ΕΒ
SAL ΕΥ(ΓΔΖΛΜΝΡ)-               ΕΒ
SAL ΕΥΒ                        ΕΒ
SAL ΕΥ(ΑΕΗΙΟΩΥΆΈΉΊΌΏΎ)-        ΕΒ

# epsilon + (ypsilon or ypsilon tonos) becomes epsilon + phi
SAL ΕΥΦ                        ΕΦ
SAL ΕΥΤΣ--                     ΕΦ       # GUESSED!
SAL ΕΥ(ΘΚΠΣΤΧ)-                ΕΦ
SAL ΕΥΞ-                       ΕΦ
SAL ΕΥΨ-                       ΕΦ

# epsilon + (iota or iota tonos) becomes iota
SAL Ε(ΙΊ)                      Ι

# epsilon is epsilon
SAL Ε                          Ε


# omikron + (iota or iota tonos) becomes iota
SAL Ο(ΙΊ)                      Ι

# omikron + (ypsilon or ypsilon tonos) becomes u
SAL Ο(ΥΎ)                      ΟΥ

# omikron is omikron
SAL Ο                          Ο

# wmega becomes omikron
SAL Ω                          Ο

# ita becomes iota
SAL Η                          Ι

# ypsilon + iota becomes iota
SAL ΥΙ                         Ι

# ypsilon becomes iota
SAL Υ                          Ι

# iota is iota
SAL Ι                          Ι

# double ksi becomes ksi 
SAL ΞΞ-                         _

# ksi + sigma becomes ksi 
SAL ΞΣ                         Ξ

# ksi is ksi
SAL Ξ                          Ξ

# psi + psi becomes psi
SAL ΨΨ-                        _

# psi + sigma becomes psi
SAL ΨΣ                         Ψ

# psi is psi
SAL Ψ                          Ψ


# iota dialitika becomes iota 
SAL Ϊ                          Ι

# ypsilon dialitika becomes I
SAL Ϋ                          Ι

# alpha tonos becomes alpha
SAL Ά                          Α

# omikron tonos becomes omikron
SAL Ό                          Ο

# iota tonos becomes iota
SAL Ί                          Ι

# epsilon tonos becomes epsilon
SAL Έ                          Ε

# ypsilon tonos becomes ypsilon
SAL Ύ                          Υ

# wmega tonos becomes omikron
SAL Ώ                          Ο

# ita tonos becomes iota
SAL Ή                          Ι
